Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7143.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-15 of the General Laws entitled "Determination of Need for New
Healthcare Equipment and New Institutional Health Services" is hereby repealed in its entirety.
CHAPTER 23-15
Determination of Need for New Healthcare Equipment and New Institutional Health Services
23-15-1. Short title.
This chapter may be cited as the “Health Care Certificate of Need Act of Rhode Island”.
23-15-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Affected person” means and includes the person whose proposal is being reviewed, or
the applicant, healthcare facilities located within the state that provide institutional health services,
the state medical society, the state osteopathic society, those voluntary nonprofit area-wide
planning agencies that may be established in the state, the state budget office, the office of health
insurance commissioner, any hospital or medical service corporation organized under the laws of
the state, the statewide health coordinating council, contiguous health-systems agencies, and those
members of the public who are to be served by the proposed, new institutional health services or
new healthcare equipment.
(2) “Cost-impact analysis” means a written analysis of the effect that a proposal to offer or
develop new institutional health services or new healthcare equipment, if approved, will have on

healthcare costs and shall include any detail that may be prescribed by the state agency in rules and
regulations.
(3) “Director” means the director of the Rhode Island state department of health.
(4)(i) “Healthcare facility” means any institutional health-service provider, facility or
institution, place, building, agency, or portion of them, whether a partnership or corporation,
whether public or private, whether organized for profit or not, used, operated, or engaged in
providing healthcare services that are limited to hospitals, nursing facilities, home nursing-care
provider, home-care provider, hospice provider, inpatient rehabilitation centers (including drug
and/or alcohol abuse treatment centers), freestanding emergency-care facilities as defined in § 23-
17-2, certain facilities providing surgical treatment to patients not requiring hospitalization (surgi-
centers, multi-practice, physician ambulatory-surgery centers and multi-practice, podiatry
ambulatory-surgery centers), and facilities providing inpatient hospice care. Single-practice
physician or podiatry ambulatory-surgery centers (as defined in § 23-17-2(17), (18), respectively)
are exempt from the requirements of chapter 15 of this title; provided, however, that such
exemption shall not apply if a single-practice physician or podiatry ambulatory-surgery center is
established by a medical practice group (as defined in § 5-37-1) within two (2) years following the
formation of such medical practice group, when such medical practice group is formed by the
merger or consolidation of two (2) or more medical practice groups or the acquisition of one
medical practice group by another medical practice group. Medical spas as defined in chapter 105
of this title are exempt from the requirements of this chapter. The term “healthcare facility” does
not include Christian Science institutions (also known as Christian Science nursing facilities) listed
and certified by the Commission for Accreditation of Christian Science Nursing
Organizations/Facilities, Inc.
(ii) Any provider of hospice care who provides hospice care without charge shall be exempt
from the provisions of this chapter.
(5) “Healthcare provider” means a person who is a direct provider of healthcare services
(including but not limited to physicians, dentists, nurses, podiatrists, physician assistants, or nurse
practitioners) in that the person’s primary current activity is the provision of healthcare services for
persons.
(6) “Health services” means organized program components for preventive, assessment,
maintenance, diagnostic, treatment, and rehabilitative services provided in a healthcare facility.
(7) “Health services council” means the advisory body to the Rhode Island state department
of health established in accordance with chapter 17 of this title, appointed and empowered as
provided to serve as the advisory body to the state agency in its review functions under this chapter.
LC003619 - Page 2 of 15

(8) “Institutional health services” means health services provided in or through healthcare
facilities and includes the entities in or through that the services are provided.
(9) “New healthcare equipment” means any single piece of medical equipment (and any
components that constitute operational components of the piece of medical equipment) proposed
to be utilized in conjunction with the provision of services to patients or the public, the capital costs
of which would exceed two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000); provided,
however, that the state agency shall exempt from review any application that proposes one-for-one
equipment replacement as defined in regulation. Further, beginning July 1, 2012, and each July
thereafter, the amount shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the consumer price index
for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics
as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
(10) “New institutional health services” means and includes:
(i) Construction, development, or other establishment of a new healthcare facility.
(ii) Any expenditure, except acquisitions of an existing healthcare facility, that will not
result in a change in the services or bed capacity of the healthcare facility by, or on behalf of, an
existing healthcare facility in excess of five million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($5,250,000)
which is a capital expenditure including expenditures for predevelopment activities; provided
further, beginning July 1, 2012, and each July thereafter, the amount shall be adjusted by the
percentage of increase in the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published
by the United States Department of Labor Statistics as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
(iii) Where a person makes an acquisition by, or on behalf of, a healthcare facility or health
maintenance organization under lease or comparable arrangement or through donation, which
would have required review if the acquisition had been by purchase, the acquisition shall be deemed
a capital expenditure subject to review.
(iv) Any capital expenditure that results in the addition of a health service or that changes
the bed capacity of a healthcare facility with respect to which the expenditure is made, except that
the state agency may exempt from review, by rules and regulations promulgated for this chapter,
any bed reclassifications made to licensed nursing facilities and annual increases in licensed bed
capacities of nursing facilities that do not exceed the greater of ten (10) beds or ten percent (10%)
of facility licensed bed capacity and for which the related capital expenditure does not exceed two
million dollars ($2,000,000).
(v) Any health service proposed to be offered to patients or the public by a healthcare
facility that was not offered on a regular basis in or through the facility within the twelve-month
(12) period prior to the time the service would be offered, and that increases operating expenses by
LC003619 - Page 3 of 15

more than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000), except that the state agency may
exempt from review, by rules and regulations promulgated for this chapter, any health service
involving reclassification of bed capacity made to licensed nursing facilities. Further, beginning
July 1, 2012, and each July thereafter, the amount shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase
in the consumer price index for all urban consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States
Department of Labor Statistics as of September 30 of the prior calendar year.
(vi) Any new or expanded tertiary or specialty-care service, regardless of capital expense
or operating expense, as defined by and listed in regulation, the list not to exceed a total of twelve
(12) categories of services at any one time and shall include full-body magnetic resonance imaging
and computerized axial tomography; provided, however, that the state agency shall exempt from
review any application that proposes one-for-one equipment replacement as defined by and listed
in regulation. Acquisition of full body magnetic resonance imaging and computerized axial
tomography shall not require a certificate-of-need review and approval by the state agency if
satisfactory evidence is provided to the state agency that it was acquired for under one million
dollars ($1,000,000) on or before January 1, 2010, and was in operation on or before July 1, 2010.
(11) “Person” means any individual, trust or estate, partnership, corporation (including
associations, joint stock companies, and insurance companies), state or political subdivision, or
instrumentality of a state.
(12) “Predevelopment activities” means expenditures for architectural designs, plans,
working drawings, and specifications, site acquisition, professional consultations, preliminary
plans, studies, and surveys made in preparation for the offering of a new, institutional health
service.
(13) “State agency” means the Rhode Island state department of health.
(14) “To develop” means to undertake those activities that, on their completion, will result
in the offering of a new, institutional health service or new healthcare equipment or the incurring
of a financial obligation, in relation to the offering of that service.
(15) “To offer” means to hold oneself out as capable of providing, or as having the means
for the provision of, specified health services or healthcare equipment.
23-15-3. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and
enforcement of standards for the authorization and allocation of new institutional health services
and new health care equipment.
23-15-4. Review and approval of new health care equipment and new institutional
health services.
LC003619 - Page 4 of 15

(a) No health care provider or health care facility shall develop or offer new health care
equipment or new institutional health services in Rhode Island, the magnitude of which exceeds
the limits defined by this chapter, without prior review by the health services council and approval
by the state agency; except that review by the health services council may be waived in the case of
expeditious reviews conducted in accordance with § 23-15-5, and except that health maintenance
organizations which fulfill criteria to be established in rules and regulations promulgated by the
state agency with the advice of the health services council shall be exempted from the review and
approval requirement established in this section upon approval by the state agency of an application
for exemption from the review and approval requirement established in this section which contain
any information that the state agency may require to determine if the health maintenance
organization meets the criteria.
(b) No approval shall be made without an adequate demonstration of need by the applicant
at the time and place and under the circumstances proposed, nor shall the approval be made without
a determination that a proposal for which need has been demonstrated is also affordable by the
people of the state.
(c) No approval of new institutional health services for the provision of health services to
inpatients shall be granted unless the written findings required in accordance with § 23-15-6(b)(6)
are made.
(d) Applications for determination of need shall be filed with the state agency on a date
fixed by the state agency together with plans and specifications and any other appropriate data and
information that the state agency shall require by regulation, and shall be considered in relation to
each other no less than once a year. A duplicate copy of each application together with all
supporting documentation shall be kept on file by the state agency as a public record.
(e) The health services council shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the following in
conducting reviews and determining need:
(1) The relationship of the proposal to state health plans that may be formulated by the state
agency;
(2) The impact of approval or denial of the proposal on the future viability of the applicant
and of the providers of health services to a significant proportion of the population served or
proposed to be served by the applicant;
(3) The need that the population to be served by the proposed equipment or services has
for the equipment or services;
(4) The availability of alternative, less costly, or more effective methods of providing
services or equipment, including economies or improvements in service that could be derived from
LC003619 - Page 5 of 15

feasible cooperative or shared services;
(5) The immediate and long term financial feasibility of the proposal, as well as the
probable impact of the proposal on the cost of, and charges for, health services of the applicant;
(6) The relationship of the services proposed to be provided to the existing health care
system of the state;
(7) The impact of the proposal on the quality of health care in the state and in the population
area to be served by the applicant;
(8) The availability of funds for capital and operating needs for the provision of the services
or equipment proposed to be offered;
(9) The cost of financing the proposal including the reasonableness of the interest rate, the
period of borrowing, and the equity of the applicant in the proposed new institutional health service
or new equipment;
(10) The relationship, including the organizational relationship of the services or
equipment proposed, to ancillary or support services;
(11) Special needs and circumstances of those entities which provide a substantial portion
of their services or resources, or both, to individuals not residing within the state;
(12) Special needs of entities such as medical and other health professional schools,
multidisciplinary clinics, and specialty centers; also, the special needs for and availability of
osteopathic facilities and services within the state;
(13) In the case of a construction project:
(i) The costs and methods of the proposed construction,
(ii) The probable impact of the construction project reviewed on the costs of providing
health services by the person proposing the construction project; and
(iii) The proposed availability and use of safe patient handling equipment in the new or
renovated space to be constructed.
(14) Those appropriate considerations that may be established in rules and regulations
promulgated by the state agency with the advice of the health services council;
(15) The potential of the proposal to demonstrate or provide one or more innovative
approaches or methods for attaining a more cost effective and/or efficient health care system;
(16) The relationship of the proposal to the need indicated in any requests for proposals
issued by the state agency;
(17) The input of the community to be served by the proposed equipment and services and
the people of the neighborhoods close to the health care facility who are impacted by the proposal;
(18) The relationship of the proposal to any long-range capital improvement plan of the
LC003619 - Page 6 of 15

health care facility applicant.
(19) Cost impact statements forwarded pursuant to subsection 23-15-6(e).
(f) In conducting its review, the health services council shall perform the following:
(1) Within one hundred and fifteen (115) days after initiating its review, which must be
commenced no later than thirty-one (31) days after the filing of an application, the health services
council shall determine as to each proposal whether the applicant has demonstrated need at the time
and place and under the circumstances proposed, and in doing so may apply the criteria and
standards set forth in subsection (e) of this section; provided however, that a determination of need
shall not alone be sufficient to warrant a recommendation to the state agency that a proposal should
be approved. The director shall render his or her decision within five (5) days of the determination
of the health services council.
(2) Prior to the conclusion of its review in accordance with § 23-15-6(e), the health services
council shall evaluate each proposal for which a determination of need has been established in
relation to other proposals, comparing proposals with each other, whether similar or not,
establishing priorities among the proposals for which need has been determined, and taking into
consideration the criteria and standards relating to relative need and affordability as set forth in
subsection (e) of this section and § 23-15-6(f).
(3) At the conclusion of its review, the health services council shall make recommendations
to the state agency relative to approval or denial of the new institutional health services or new
health care equipment proposed; provided that:
(i) The health services council shall recommend approval of only those proposals found to
be affordable in accordance with the provisions of § 23-15-6(f); and
(ii) If the state agency proposes to render a decision that is contrary to the recommendation
of the health services council, the state agency must render its reasons for doing so in writing.
(g) Approval of new institutional health services or new health care equipment by the state
agency shall be subject to conditions that may be prescribed by rules and regulations developed by
the state agency with the advice of the health services council, but those conditions must relate to
the considerations enumerated in subsection (e) and to considerations that may be established in
regulations in accordance with subsection (e)(14).
(h) The offering or developing of new institutional health services or health care equipment
by a health care facility without prior review by the health services council and approval by the
state agency shall be grounds for the imposition of licensure sanctions on the facility, including
denial, suspension, revocation, or curtailment or for imposition of any monetary fines that may be
statutorily permitted by virtue of individual health care facility licensing statutes.
LC003619 - Page 7 of 15

(i) No government agency and no hospital or medical service corporation organized under
the laws of the state shall reimburse any health care facility or health care provider for the costs
associated with offering or developing new institutional health services or new health care
equipment unless the health care facility or health care provider has received the approval of the
state agency in accordance with this chapter. Government agencies and hospital and medical
service corporations organized under the laws of the state shall, during budget negotiations, hold
health care facilities and health care providers accountable to operating efficiencies claimed or
projected in proposals which receive the approval of the state agency in accordance with this
chapter.
(j) In addition, the state agency shall not make grants to, enter into contracts with, or
recommend approval of the use of federal or state funds by any health care facility or health care
provider which proceeds with the offering or developing of new institutional health services or new
health care equipment after disapproval by the state agency.
23-15-4.1. Exemption for nonclinical capital expenditures.
Notwithstanding the requirements of any other provisions of any general or public laws,
capital expenditures by a health care facility that are not directly related to the provision of health
services as defined in this chapter, including, but not limited to, capital expenditures for parking
lots, billing computer systems, and telephone systems, shall not require a certificate of need review
and approval by the state agency.
23-15-4.2. Exemption for research.
Notwithstanding the requirements of any other provisions of any general or public laws,
capital expenditures by a health care facility related to research in basic biomedical or medical
research areas that are not directly related to the provision of clinical or patient care services shall
not require a certificate of need review and approval by the state agency.
23-15-4.3. Repealed.
23-15-4.4. Exemption for voter approved capital bond issues for health care facilities.
Notwithstanding the requirements of any other provisions of any general law or public
laws, voter approved state bond issues authorizing capital expenditures for state health care
facilities shall not require a certificate of need review and approval by the state agency.
23-15-5. Expeditious review.
(a) Any person who proposes to offer or develop new institutional health services or new
healthcare equipment for documented emergency needs; or for the purpose of eliminating or
preventing documented fire or safety hazards affecting the lives and health of patients or staff; or
for compliance with accreditation standards required for receipt of federal or state reimbursement;
LC003619 - Page 8 of 15

or for any other purpose that the state agency may specify in rules and regulations, may apply for
an expeditious review. The state agency may exercise its discretion in recommending approvals
through an expeditious review, except that no new institutional health service or new healthcare
equipment may be approved through the expeditious review if provision of the new institutional
health service or new healthcare equipment is contra-indicated by the state health plan as may be
formulated by the state agency. Specific procedures for the conduct of expeditious reviews shall be
promulgated in rules and regulations adopted by the state agency with the advice of the health
services council.
(b) The decision of the state agency not to conduct an expeditious review shall be
reconsidered upon a written petition to the state agency, and the state agency shall be required to
respond to the written petition within ten (10) days stating whether expeditious review is granted.
If the request for reconsideration is denied, the state agency shall state the reasons in writing why
the expeditious request had been denied.
(c) The decision of the state agency in connection with an expeditious review shall be
rendered within thirty (30) days after the commencement of said review.
(d) Any healthcare facility that provides a service performed in another state and that is not
performed in the state of Rhode Island, or such service is performed in the state on a very limited
basis, shall be granted expeditious review upon request under this section, provided that such
service, among other things, has a clear effect on the timeliness, access, or quality of care and is
able to meet licensing standards.
23-15-6. Procedures for review.
(a) The state agency, with the advice of the health services council, and in accordance with
the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, after public hearing pursuant to
reasonable notice, which notice shall include affected persons, shall promulgate appropriate rules
and regulations that may be designated to further the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter
including the formulation of procedures that may be particularly necessary for the conduct on
reviews of particular types of new institutional health services or new health care equipment.
(b) Review procedures promulgated in accordance with subsection (a) shall include at least
the following, except that substitute procedures for the conduct of expeditious and accelerated
reviews may be promulgated by the state agency in accordance with § 23-15-5:
(1) Provision that the state agency established a process requiring potential applicants to
file a detailed letter of intent to submit an application at least forty-five (45) days prior to the
submission of an application and that the state agency shall undertake reviews in a timely fashion
no less often than twice a year and give written notification to affected persons of the beginning of
LC003619 - Page 9 of 15

the review including the proposed schedule for the review, the period within which a public meeting
may be held, and the manner by which notification will be provided of the time and place of any
public meeting so held.
(2) Provision that no more than one hundred and twenty (120) days shall elapse between
initial notification of affected persons and the final decision of the state agency.
(3) Provision that, if the state agency fails to act upon an application within the applicable
period established in subsection (b)(2), the applicant may apply to the superior court of Providence
County to require the state agency to act upon the application.
(4) Provision for review and comment by the health services council and any affected
person, including but not limited to those parties defined in § 23-15-2(1) and the department of
business regulation, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals, the department of human services, health maintenance organizations, and the state
professional standards review organization, on every application for the determination of need.
(5) Provision that a public meeting may be held during the course of the state agency review
at which any person may have the opportunity to present testimony. Procedures for the conduct of
the public meeting shall be established in rules and regulations promulgated by the state agency
with the advice of the health services council.
(6)(i) Provision for issuance of a written decision by the state agency which shall be based
upon the findings and recommendations of the health services council unless the state agency shall
afford written justification for variance from that decision.
(ii) In the case of any proposed new institutional health service for the provision of health
services to inpatients, a state agency shall not make a finding that the proposed new institutional
health service is needed, unless it makes written findings as to:
(A) The efficiency and appropriateness of the use of existing inpatient facilities providing
inpatient services similar to those proposed;
(B) The capital and operating costs (and their potential impact on patient charges),
efficiency, and appropriateness of the proposed new institutional health services; and
(C) Makes each of the following findings in writing:
(I) That superior alternatives to inpatient services in terms of cost, efficiency, and
appropriateness do not exist and that the development of alternatives is not practicable;
(II) That, in the case of new construction, alternatives to new construction (e.g.,
modernization or sharing arrangements) have been considered and implemented to the maximum
extent practicable;
(III) That patients will experience serious problems in terms of costs, availability, or
LC003619 - Page 10 of 15

accessibility, or any other problems that may be identified by the state agency, in obtaining inpatient
care of the type proposed in the absence of the proposed new service; and
(IV) That, in the case of a proposal for the addition of beds for the provision of skilled
nursing or intermediate care, the relationship of the addition to the plans of other agencies of the
state responsible for providing and financing long-term care (including home health services) has
been considered.
(7) Provision for the distribution of the decision of the state agency, including its findings
and recommendations, to the applicant and to affected persons.
(8) Provision that the state agency may approve or disapprove in whole or in part any
application as submitted, but that the parties may mutually agree to a modification of any element
of an application as submitted, without requiring resubmission of the application.
(9)(i) Provision that any person affected may request in writing reconsideration of a state
agency decision if the person:
(A) Presents significant relevant information not previously considered by the state agency;
(B) Demonstrates that there have been significant changes in factors or circumstances
relied upon by the state agency in reaching its decision;
(C) Demonstrates that the state agency has materially failed to follow its adopted
procedures in reaching its decision; or
(D) Provides any other basis for reconsideration that the state agency may have determined
by regulation to constitute good cause.
(ii) Procedures for reconsideration shall be established in regulations promulgated by the
state agency with the advice of the health services council.
(10) Provision that upon the request of any affected person, the decision of the state agency
to issue, deny, or withdraw a certificate of need or to grant or deny an exemption shall be
administratively reviewed under an appeals mechanism provided for in the rules and regulations of
the state agency, with the review to be conducted by a hearing officer appointed by the director of
health. The procedures for judicial review shall be in accordance with the provisions of § 42-35-
15.
(c) The state agency shall publish at least annually a report of reviews of new institutional
health services and new health care equipment conducted, together with the findings and decisions
rendered in the course of the reviews. The reports shall be published on or about February 1 of each
year and shall contain evaluations of the prior year’s statutory changes where feasible.
(d) All applications reviewed by the state agency and all written materials pertinent to state
agency review, including minutes of all health services council meetings, shall be accessible to the
LC003619 - Page 11 of 15

public upon request.
(e) In the case or review of proposals by health care facilities who by contractual
agreement, chapter 19 of title 27, or other statute are required to adhere to an annual schedule of
budget or reimbursement determination to which the state is a party, the state budget office, the
office of the health insurance commissioner, and hospital service corporations organized under
chapter 19 of title 27 shall forward to the health services council within forty-five (45) days of the
initiation of the review of the proposals by the health services council under § 23-15-4(f)(1):
(1) A cost impact analysis of each proposal which analysis shall include, but not be limited
to, consideration of increases in operating expenses, per diem rates, health care insurance
premiums, and public expenditures; and
(2) Comments on acceptable interest rates and minimum equity contributions and/or
maximum debt to be incurred in financing needed proposals.
(f) The health services council shall not make a recommendation to the state agency that a
proposal be approved unless it is found that the proposal is affordable to the people of the state. In
determining whether or not a proposal is affordable, the health service council shall consider the
condition of the state’s economy, the statements of authorities and/or parties affected by the
proposals, and any other factors that it may deem appropriate.
23-15-6.1. Action subsequent to review.
Development of any new institutional health services or new health care equipment
approved by the state agency must be initiated within one year of the date of the approval and may
not exceed the maximum amount of capital expenditures specified in the decision of the state
agency without prior authorization of the state agency. The state agency, with the advice of the
health services council, shall adopt procedures for the review of the applicant’s failure to develop
new institutional health services or new health care equipment within the timeframe and capital
limitation stipulated in this section, and for the withdrawal of approval in the absence of a good
faith effort to meet the stipulated timeframe.
23-15-7. Health services council.
The health services council, established in accordance with chapter 17 of this title, shall
function as the advisory body to the state agency in discharging the purpose of this chapter.
23-15-8. Funds for administration.
There is authorized to be appropriated from the state treasury those sums that may be
necessary for the purposes of administering this chapter.
23-15-9. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or the application of any provision of this chapter to any
LC003619 - Page 12 of 15

person or circumstances shall be held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the provisions or
application of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and to this end the provisions of the chapter are declared to be severable.
23-15-10. Application fees.
The state agency shall require that any applicant for certificate of need submit an
application fee prior to requesting any review of matters pursuant to the requirements of this
chapter; except that health care facilities owned and operated by the state of Rhode Island shall be
exempt from this application fee requirement. The application fee shall be paid by check made
payable to the general treasurer. Except for applications that propose new or expanded tertiary or
specialty care services as defined in subdivision 23-15-2(10)(vi), submission of any application
filed in accordance with § 23-15-4(d) shall include an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500)
per application plus an amount equal to one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital
expenditure costs associated with the application. For an application filed in accordance with the
requirements of § 23-15-5 (Expeditious review), the application shall include an application
processing fee of seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750) per application plus an amount equal to
one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital expenditure costs associated with the
application. Applications that propose new or expanded tertiary or specialty care services as defined
in subdivision 23-15-2(10)(vi), shall include an application fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
plus an amount equal to one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital expenditure costs
associated with the application. Application fees shall be non-refundable. All fees received
pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the general fund.
23-15-11. Reports, use of experts, all costs and expenses.
The state agency may in effectuating the purposes of this chapter engage experts or
consultants including, but not limited to, actuaries, investment bankers, accountants, attorneys, or
industry analysts. Except for privileged or confidential communications between the state agency
and engaged attorneys, all copies of final reports prepared by experts and consultants, and all costs
and expenses associated with the reports, shall be public. All costs and expenses incurred under
this provision shall be the responsibility of the applicant in an amount to be determined by the
director as he or she shall deem appropriate. No application made pursuant to the requirements of
this chapter shall be considered complete unless an agreement has been executed with the director
for the payment of all costs and expenses in accordance with this section. The maximum cost and
expense to an applicant for experts and/or consultants that may be required by the state agency shall
be twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); provided however, that the maximum amount shall be
increased by regulations promulgated by the state agency on or after January 1, 2008 by the most
LC003619 - Page 13 of 15

recently available annual increase in the federal consumer price index as determined by the state
agency.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003619
========
LC003619 - Page 14 of 15